Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1110
Stipend.

An authorized agency shall pay a stipend to qualified design-builders that submit responsive proposals but are not selected. Payment of the stipend shall give the authorized agency ownership of the intellectual property contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts. The amount of the stipend shall be at the discretion of the authorized agency. The refusal to pay or accept the stipend shall leave the intellectual property contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts in the possession of the creator of the proposals and alternative technical concepts.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 10.